Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5430
Violation of cease and desist order; penalty.

Any utilization review agent who violates a cease and desist order of the director under section 44-5429 may after notice and hearing and upon order of the director be subject to:

(1) A monetary penalty of not more than thirty thousand dollars for each violation, not to exceed an aggregate penalty of one hundred fifty thousand dollars; and

(2) Suspension or revocation of the utilization review agent's license to do business in this state.

Laws 1998, LB 1162, § 15.